apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix
<!--Enclitic pronouns-->
<pardef n="personal_pronouns__clt__prn">
    <!-- 1st person singular -->
     <e><p><l>me</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>mi</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>me</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    
    <!-- 2nd person singular -->
     <e><p><l>te</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ti</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>te</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

    <!-- 3rd person singular masculine and neuter--> 
     <e><p><l>ga</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>mu</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ga</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e><!--these two variants-->
     <e r="LR"><p><l>nj</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e><!--after a preposition i.e. za nj == za njega == for him-->

    <!-- 3rd person singular feminine--> 
     <e><p><l>je</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>joj</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ju</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>je</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>nju</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e><!--after prepositions-->
              
    <!-- 1st person plural -->
     <e><p><l>nas</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>nam</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>nas</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     
    <!-- 2nd person plural -->
     <e><p><l>vas</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>vam</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>vas</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>     

    <!-- 3rd person plural -->
     <e><p><l>ih</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>im</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>ih</l><r>clitic<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>          
</pardef>
<!-- Noun paradigms -->
    <!-- 1-syllable -->
    <pardef n="Škot__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gram__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Gr/k__n"    >
    <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kom</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ke</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="Škot"><i>Škot</i><par n="Škot__n" /></e>
<e lm="gram"><i>gram</i><par n="gram__n" /></e>
<e lm="Grk"><i>Gr</i><par n="Gr/k__n" /></e>
